Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 60 Council on Elementary and Secondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-60-8.1.
Regents recovery for indirect costs.

The regents shall apply for recovery of indirect cost when recovery is permissible under federal statute and grant regulations. All funds received for indirect costs recovery shall be turned over to the general treasurer and shall be placed in a restricted account for specific purposes designated by the regents. The regents shall annually report to the general assembly the estimated amount of federal indirect cost recoveries for the next fiscal year together with the intended use of the funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 324, § 1.

16-60-9.
Investigative powers of board.

The board of regents shall have the power to investigate all transactions and matters relating to public elementary and secondary education in the state and to summon witnesses, administer oaths, and to require testimony and the production of records in the same manner and to the same extent as a court of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2.

16-60-10.
Applicability of Administrative Procedures Act.

The provisions of §§

42-35-1

through

42-35-8

shall apply to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 305, § 1.

16-60-11.
Liberal construction of chapter required.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-60-12.
Meaning of terms in existing law.

When in any law, resolution, document, record, instrument, proceeding, or other place the words “board of education,” “state board of education,” or “board of regents for education” as they shall apply to elementary and secondary education shall appear they shall be construed to mean “board of regents for elementary and secondary education”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 2.

16-60-13.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation made under it, or its application to any rule or regulation made under it, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule, or regulation and the application of that provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected the invalidity. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.